District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0416.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Displacement Prevention Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 47-1806.06(a) of the D.C. Official Code is amended by adding a new
paragraph (3A) to read as follows:
“(3A) For all claimants whose principal place of residence is located within
census tracts 73.04, 74.04, 98.04, or 104, for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025,
the total allowable credit may exceed the credit allowed in paragraph (1) of this subsection but
shall not exceed twice the credit allowed in paragraph (1) of this subsection.”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.


The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).